Colorado statutes. TITLE 32 Special Districts
ARTICLE 20 COLORADO NEW ENERGY IMPROVEMENT DISTRICT
32-20-107. Special assessment constitutes lien - filing - sale of property for nonpayment.

A special assessment, together with all interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and associated collection costs constitutes, from the date of the recording of the assessing resolution and assessment roll pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, a perpetual lien in the amount assessed against the assessed eligible real property and has priority over all other liens; except that:

General property tax liens have priority over district special assessment liens;

A district special assessment lien has priority over preexisting liens only if each lienholder consents as specified in section 32-20-105 (3)(i) and each consent and the special assessment lien and special assessment roll are recorded in the real estate records of the county where the property is located. Before the recording of the special assessment lien and special assessment roll, the applicant must submit to the district:

Written consent to the special assessment by all individuals or entities shown on a commitment of title insurance as holders of mortgages or deeds of trust encumbering the applicant's property; and

Evidence that there are no delinquent taxes, special assessments, or water or sewer charges on the property; that the property is not subject to a trust deed or other lien on which there is a recorded notice of default, foreclosure, or delinquency that has not been cured; and that there are no involuntary liens, including a lien on real property or on the proceeds of a contract relating to real property, for services, labor, or materials furnished in connection with the construction or improvement of the property.

Liens for assessments imposed by other governmental entities have coequal priority with district special assessment liens.

Neither the sale of eligible real property or tax liens in the district to enforce the payment of general ad valorem taxes nor the issuance of a treasurer's deed in connection with the sale extinguishes the lien of a special assessment. If assessed eligible real property is subdivided, the board may apportion the special assessment lien in the manner provided in the assessing resolution.

The district shall transmit to a county clerk and recorder of a county that includes eligible real property included in the district copies of the district's assessing resolution after its final adoption by the board and the assessment roll for recording on the land records of each unit of eligible real property assessed within the county as provided in article 30, 35, or 36 of title 38, C.R.S. The assessing resolution and assessment roll shall be indexed in the grantor index under the name of the district member and in the grantee index under the Colorado new energy improvement district. In addition, the county clerk and recorder shall file copies of the assessing resolution, after its final adoption by the board, and the assessment roll with the county assessor and the county treasurer. The county assessor is authorized to create separate schedules for each unit of eligible real property assessed within the county pursuant to the resolution.

No delays, mistakes, errors, or irregularities in any act or proceeding authorized or required by this article shall prejudice or invalidate any final special assessment, and such mistakes, errors, or irregularities may be remedied by subsequent filings, amending acts, or proceedings. A remedied special assessment takes effect as of the date of the original filing, act, or proceeding. If a court of competent jurisdiction sets aside any final assessment or if, for any other reason, the board determines it to be necessary to alter any final special assessment, the board, upon notice as required in the making of an original special assessment, may make a new special assessment in accordance with the provisions of this article.

In case of default in the payment of any installment of principal or interest when due, the county treasurer shall advertise and sell the assessed eligible real property tax lien defaulted upon for the payment of the whole of the unpaid installment of principal and interest. Advertisements and sales shall be made at the same times, in the same manner, under all the same conditions and penalties, and with the same effect as provided by general law for sales of real property tax liens in default of payment of the general property tax.

At any tax lien sale by a county treasurer of any eligible real property, the board may participate in the tax lien sale auction by bidding on the lien for the district and receive certificates of purchase for the lien in the name of the district if it is the successful bidder. The certificates shall be received and credited at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, on account of the assessment installment in pursuance of which the sale was made. The board may thereafter sell the certificates at their face value, with all interest and penalties accrued, and assign the certificates to the purchaser in the name of the district. The board shall credit the proceeds of the sale to the fund created by resolution for the payment of the special assessments, respectively; except that, if the new energy improvements were financed under section 32-20-105 (3)(h), the board shall credit the proceeds of the tax lien sale to the private third party that financed the new energy improvements. If the district has repaid all special assessment bonds in full, the board may sell the certificates for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (4). Such assignments are without recourse, and the sale and assignments operate as a lien in favor of the purchaser and assignee as is provided by law in the case of sale of real estate in default of payment of the general property taxes.

The board, as a purchaser of tax liens, has the right to apply for tax deeds on certificates of purchase at any time after three years from the date of issuance of the certificates in accordance with article 11 of title 39, C.R.S., and the deeds shall be issued as provided by law for issuance of tax deeds for the nonpayment of the general property taxes or special assessments.

Cumulatively with all other remedies, the district, as the owner of property by virtue of a tax deed, may sell the property for the best price obtainable at public sale, at auction, or by sealed bids. A sale shall be held after public notice by the board to all persons having or claiming any interest in the eligible real property to be sold or in the proceeds of the sale by publication of the notice three times, a week apart, in a weekly or daily newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the property is located. The notice shall describe the property and state the time, place, and manner of receiving bids; except that the time fixed for the sale shall not be less than ten days after the last publication. The board may reject any and all bids. Any interested party, at any time within ten days after the receipt of bids for the sale of property, may file with the board a written protest as to the sufficiency of the amount of any bid made or the validity of the proceedings for the sale. If the protest is denied, the protestor, within ten days thereafter, shall commence an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin or restrain the board from completing the sale. If no such action is commenced, all protests or objections to the sale shall be waived, and the board shall then convey the property to the successful bidder by quitclaim deed.

Repealed.

The board shall credit the proceeds of any sale of property to the appropriate special assessment fund; except that, if the new energy improvements were financed under section 32-20-105 (3)(h), the board shall credit the proceeds of the sale to the private third party that financed the new energy improvements. The district shall deduct from the appropriate special assessment fund the necessary expenses in securing deeds and taking proceedings for the sale or foreclosure.

If a treasurer's deed is issued for a property that is included within the district pursuant to section 32-20-105 and upon which a priority special assessment lien has been placed, the district shall use its reserve account to satisfy special assessment obligations of the property on behalf of the holder of the treasurer's deed in accordance with the terms and duration specified in a written agreement between the county in which the property is located and the district.

When the district has sold or conveyed at a fair market value certificates of purchase or property that the district has acquired in satisfaction or discharge of special assessment liens, the sales and conveyances are hereby validated and confirmed as against all parties having or claiming any interest in the property or sale proceeds.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2215, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), (4)(b), and (4)(f) amended, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2018, § 6, effective May 28.

L. 2016:

(1)(a)(I), IP(1)(a)(II), (1)(a)(II)(A), (1)(b), (2), (3), (4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(c), and (4)(d) amended, (4)(e) repealed, and (4)(g) added, (SB 16-171), ch. 238, p. 977, § 4, effective August 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1), (2), (4)(b), and (4)(f) were amended by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-108. Special assessment bonds - legal investment - exemption from taxation.

The district shall issue special assessment bonds in an aggregate principal amount of not more than eight hundred million dollars for the purpose of generating the moneys needed to make reimbursement or a direct payment to district members and to pay other costs of the district. The board shall issue the bonds pursuant to a resolution of the board or a trust indenture. The bonds must not be secured by an encumbrance, mortgage, or other pledge of real or personal property of the district and are payable from special assessments, other than those attributable to private third-party financing under section 32-20-105 (3)(h), and any other lawfully pledged district revenues unless the bond resolution or trust indenture specifically limits the source of district revenues from which the bonds are payable. The bonds do not constitute a debt or other financial obligation of the state. The board may adopt one or more resolutions creating special assessment units comprised of multiple units of eligible real property on which the board has levied a special assessment and may issue special assessment bonds payable from special assessments imposed within the entire district, other than those attributable to private third-party financing under section 32-20-105 (3)(h), or from special assessments imposed only within one or more specified special assessment units.

Bonds may be executed and delivered at such times; may be in such form and denominations and include such terms and maturities; may be subject to optional or mandatory redemption prior to maturity with or without a premium; may be in fully registered form or bearer form registrable as to principal or interest or both; may bear such conversion privileges; may be payable in such installments and at such times not exceeding twenty years from the date thereof; may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state; may bear interest at such rate or rates per annum, which may be fixed or vary according to index, procedure, or formula or as determined by the district without regard to any interest rate limitation appearing in any other law of the state; may be subject to purchase at the option of the holder or the district; may be evidenced in such manner; may be executed by such officers of the district, including the use of one or more facsimile signatures so long as at least one manual signature appears on the bonds, which may be either of the chair of the board or of an agent of the district authenticating the same; may be in the form of coupon bonds that have attached interest coupons bearing a manual or facsimile signature of the chair or the agent; and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this article, all as provided in the resolution of the board under which the bonds are authorized to be issued or as provided in a trust indenture between the district and any bank or trust company having full trust powers.

Bonds may be sold at public or private sale at such price or prices, in such manner, and at such times as determined by the district, and the district may pay all fees, expenses, and commissions that it deems necessary or advantageous in connection with the sale of the bonds. The power to fix the date of sale of the bonds, to receive bids or proposals, to award and sell bonds, to fix interest rates, and to take all other action necessary to sell and deliver the bonds may be delegated to an officer or agent of the district. Any outstanding bonds may be refunded by the district pursuant to article 56 of title 11, C.R.S. All bonds and any interest coupons applicable thereto are declared to be negotiable instruments.

The resolution or a trust indenture authorizing the issuance of the bonds may pledge all or a portion of any special fund created by the district, may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of holders of any of the bonds as the district deems appropriate, may set forth the rights and remedies of the holders of any of the bonds, and may contain provisions that the district deems appropriate for the security of the holders of the bonds, including, but not limited to, provisions for letters of credit, insurance, standby credit agreements, or other forms of credit ensuring timely payment of the bonds, including the redemption price or the purchase price. The resolution or trust indenture shall contain a provision that states that the bonds do not constitute a debt or other financial obligation of the state, and the same or a similar provision shall also appear on the bonds.

Any pledge of moneys or other property made by the district or by any person or governmental unit with which the district contracts shall be valid and binding from the time the pledge is made. The moneys or other property so pledged shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the pledging party regardless of whether the claiming party has notice of the lien. The instrument by which the pledge is created need not be recorded or filed.

No member of the board, employee, officer, or agent of the district, or other person executing bonds shall be liable personally on the bonds or subject to any personal liability by reason of the issuance thereof.

The district may purchase its bonds out of any available moneys and may hold, pledge, cancel, or resell such bonds subject to and in accordance with agreements with the holders thereof.

The state hereby pledges and agrees with the holders of any bonds, private third parties that have financed new energy improvements under section 32-20-105 (3)(h), and those parties who enter into contracts with the district pursuant to this article that the state will not limit, alter, restrict, or impair the rights vested in the district or the rights or obligations of any person with which the district contracts to fulfill the terms of any agreements made pursuant to this article. The state further agrees that it will not in any way impair the rights or remedies of:

The holders of bonds until the bonds have been paid or until adequate provision for payment has been made; or

The private third parties that have financed new energy improvements under section 32-20-105 (3)(h).

The district may include the provisions specified in paragraph (a) of this subsection (8) in its bonds or contracts with private third parties that have financed new energy improvements under section 32-20-105 (3)(h).

Banks, trust companies, savings and loan associations, insurance companies, executors, administrators, guardians, trustees, and other fiduciaries may legally invest any moneys within their control in any bonds issued under this article. Public entities, as defined in section 24-75-601 (1), C.R.S., may invest public funds in bonds only if the bonds satisfy the investment requirements established in part 6 of article 75 of title 24, C.R.S.

Bonds shall be exempt from all taxation and assessments in the state. In the resolution or indenture authorizing bonds, the district may waive the exemption from federal income taxation for interest on the bonds. Bonds shall be exempt from the provisions of article 51 of title 11, C.R.S. The board may elect to apply any or all of the provisions of the "Supplemental Public Securities Act", part 2 of article 57 of title 11, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2218, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

(1) and (8) amended, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2020, § 7, effective May 28.

Cross references:

In 2013, subsections (1) and (8) were amended by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-109. Credit towards demand-side management goals for public utilities.

For any gas utility or electric utility for which the public utilities commission has developed expenditure and natural gas savings targets pursuant to section 40-3.2-103, C.R.S., or established energy saving and peak demand reduction goals pursuant to section 40-3.2-104, C.R.S., the commission shall determine the extent to which the marketing, promotional, and other efforts of the utility have contributed to energy efficiency improvements funded by the district. To the extent that the commission finds that the utility's efforts have created energy savings, the commission shall allow the utility to count the related energy savings towards compliance with the gas utility's expenditure and natural gas savings targets or with the electric utility's energy savings and peak demand reduction goals, as applicable, using any method deemed appropriate by the commission.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2220, § 1, effective June 11.

32-20-110. Repeal of article - inapplicable if the district has outstanding bond obligations. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire article added, (HB 10-1328), ch. 426, p. 2220, § 1, effective June 11.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-212), ch. 347, p. 2021, § 8, effective May 28.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "New Energy Jobs Act of 2013". For the short title, see section 1 of chapter 347, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

32-20-111. Procedure if lien subordination not sought.

The provisions of this article 20 pertaining to the requirement of title insurance contained in section 32-20-105 (3) and the provision of notice, objection, and appeal contained in section 32-20-106 (3)(a)(I), (3)(a)(II), (3)(b), and (3)(c), and all sections referencing these sections, do not apply to residential eligible real property if the property owner or private third party that is financing the improvements are not seeking to subordinate the priority of existing mortgages pursuant to section 32-20-105 (3)(i).

Source:

L. 2017:

Entire section added, (HB 17-1363), ch. 357, p. 1883, § 3, effective August 9.